Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.035

Bylaws—Employees—Rules—Periodic reports and roster.

(1) The board may adopt and amend bylaws establishing its organization and method of operation, including but not limited to meetings, maintenance of books and records, publication of reports, code of ethics, and rosters, and adoption and use of a seal.

(2) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of any business of the board.

(3) The board shall appoint its director, who must hold a valid Washington license as a professional engineer or professional land surveyor.

(4) The board may employ such persons as are necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.

(5) It may adopt rules reasonably necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The board shall submit to the governor periodic reports as may be required. A roster, showing the names and places of business of all registered professional engineers and land surveyors may be published for distribution, upon request, to professional engineers and land surveyors registered under this chapter and to the public.

[ 2020 c 47 s 1; 2019 c 442 s 19; 2002 c 86 s 224; 1997 c 247 s 2; 1986 c 102 s 2; 1977 c 75 s 10; 1961 c 142 s 1; 1959 c 297 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.